Illinois, session 104th, HB4394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 203/20)7    Sec. 20. Reports by law enforcement officers.8    (a) A law enforcement officer shall complete a written 9police report upon receiving the following, regardless of 10where the incident occurred:11        (1) an allegation by a person that the person has been 12    sexually assaulted or sexually abused regardless of 13    jurisdiction;14        (2) information from hospital or medical personnel 15    provided under Section 3.2 of the Criminal Identification 16    Act; or17        (3) information from a witness who personally observed 18    what appeared to be a sexual assault or sexual abuse or 19    attempted sexual assault or sexual abuse.20    (b) The written report shall include the following, if 21known:22        (1) the victim's name or other identifier;23        (2) the victim's contact information;  HB4394 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 15620 RLC 28787 b1        (3) time, date, and location of offense;2        (4) information provided by the victim;3        (5) the suspect's description and name, if known;4        (6) names of persons with information relevant to the 5    time before, during, or after the sexual assault or sexual 6    abuse, and their contact information;7        (7) names of medical professionals who provided a 8    medical forensic examination of the victim and any 9    information they provided about the sexual assault or 10    sexual abuse;11        (8) whether an Illinois State Police Sexual Assault 12    Evidence Collection Kit was completed, the name and 13    contact information for the hospital, and whether the 14    victim consented to testing of the Evidence Collection Kit 15    by law enforcement;16        (9) whether a urine or blood sample was collected and 17    whether the victim consented to testing of a toxicology 18    screen by law enforcement;19        (10) information the victim related to medical 20    professionals during a medical forensic examination which 21    the victim consented to disclosure to law enforcement; and22        (11) other relevant information.23    (c) If the sexual assault or sexual abuse occurred in 24another jurisdiction, the law enforcement officer taking the 25report must submit the report to the law enforcement agency 26having jurisdiction in person or via fax or email within 24   HB4394 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 15620 RLC 28787 b1hours of receiving information about the sexual assault or 2sexual abuse.3    (d) Within 24 hours of receiving a report from a law 4enforcement agency in another jurisdiction in accordance with 5subsection (c), the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction 6shall submit a written confirmation to the law enforcement 7agency that wrote the report. The written confirmation shall 8contain the name and identifier of the person and confirming 9receipt of the report and a name and contact phone number that 10will be given to the victim. The written confirmation shall be 11delivered in person or via fax or email.12    (e) No law enforcement officer shall require a victim of 13sexual assault or sexual abuse to submit to an interview.14    (f) No law enforcement agency may refuse to complete a 15written report as required by this Section on any ground. A law 16enforcement officer shall not discourage or attempt to 17discourage a victim from filing a police report concerning 18sexual assault or sexual abuse. 19    (g) All law enforcement agencies shall ensure that all 20officers responding to or investigating a complaint of sexual 21assault or sexual abuse have successfully completed training 22under Section 10.21 of the Illinois Police Training Act and 23Section 2605-51 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 24Administrative Code of Illinois.25    (h) At law enforcement agencies that employ officers of 26more than one sex or gender who have the training described in   HB4394 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 15620 RLC 28787 b1subsection (g), a law enforcement officer shall inform a 2victim of sexual assault or sexual abuse of the opportunity to 3request to be interviewed by an officer of a particular sex or 4gender. If, when a request is made, no officer at that agency 5of the requested sex or gender with the training described in 6subsection (g) is reasonably available, the victim may consent 7to be interviewed by any available law enforcement officer 8with that training, decline to be interviewed, or choose to 9schedule an interview at another time when such an officer is 10expected to be available. Every law enforcement agency shall 11establish a policy that defines "reasonably available" for 12this Section.13    The duty to inform the victim about the opportunity to 14request to be interviewed by an officer of a particular sex or 15gender shall not apply to the preliminary investigation by the 16initial responding officer at the crime scene, in the 17emergency department of a hospital, at an approved pediatric 18health care facility, or under exigent circumstances. The 19initial responding officer shall not require a victim to 20submit to an interview, pursuant to subsection (e). If the 21victim requests an officer of a particular sex or gender at the 22scene, in the emergency department of a hospital, at an 23approved pediatric health care facility, or during exigent 24circumstances, the responding officer shall accommodate the 25request when an officer of the requested sex or gender is 26reasonably available.  HB4394 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 15620 RLC 28787 b1    (i) A law enforcement officer shall inform a victim of 2sexual assault or sexual abuse of the opportunity to have a 3support person of the victim's choosing present during any 4interview by a law enforcement officer or prosecutor, unless 5the law enforcement officer or prosecutor makes a good faith 6determination based on professional judgment, before or during 7the interview, that the presence of the support person would 8be detrimental to the purpose of the interview. If the support 9person engages in behavior that disrupts or undermines the 10interview, the support person may be removed. If the support 11person is not permitted to accompany the victim or is removed, 12the victim may consent to be interviewed without a support 13person, decline to be interviewed, or choose to schedule an 14interview at another time and bring a different support 15person.16    The duty to inform the victim about the opportunity to 17have a support person shall not apply to the preliminary 18investigation by the initial responding officer at the crime 19scene, in the emergency department of a hospital, at an 20approved pediatric health care facility, or under exigent 21circumstances. The initial responding officer shall not 22require a victim to submit to an interview, pursuant to 23subsection (e). Nothing in this Section prohibits the initial 24responding officer from offering or allowing a victim to have 25a support person. 26(Source: P.A. 104-173, eff. 1-1-26.)